Utah statutes.
10-3-603.   Public records.

The governing body of each municipality shall keep a journal of its proceedings. The books, records, accounts and documents of each municipality shall be kept at the office of the recorder and approved copies shall be open and available to the public during regular business hours for examination and copying. The governing body may by resolution establish reasonable charges for providing copies of its public records to individuals, except when by law the municipality must provide the records without cost to the public.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

